Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Expenditures for medical care and health insurance. new text end new text begin (a) The amount paid for medical care is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) The subtraction under this subdivision does not include amounts: new text end new text begin (1) compensated by insurance or paid or reimbursed by an employer or a plan under sections 104 (health care reimbursement accounts), 105 (accident and health plans), 125 (cafeteria and flexible spending accounts), 223 (health care savings accounts), or other similar provisions of the Internal Revenue Code; or new text end new text begin (2) used to compute the credit under section 290.0672. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "medical care" means: new text end new text begin (1) amounts paid for services and goods for which a federal Medicaid match would be available under chapter 256B, without regard to whether the provider received reimbursement under chapter 256B; and new text end new text begin (2) amounts paid for insurance, as defined in section 213(d)(1)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end